Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.490

Application of chapter.

The alternative public works contracting procedures authorized under this chapter are limited to public works contracts signed before July 1, 2031. Methods of public works contracting authorized under this chapter shall remain in full force and effect until completion of contracts signed before July 1, 2031.

[ 2021 c 230 s 18; 2013 c 222 s 20; 2007 c 494 s 501; 2001 c 328 s 5. Prior: 1997 c 376 s 7; 1997 c 220 s 404 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997); 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 305; 1994 c 132 s 12. Formerly RCW 39.10.120.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2021 c 230: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Effective date—2001 c 328: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Effective date—1997 c 376: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Referendum—Other legislation limited—Legislators' personal intent not indicated—Reimbursements for election—Voters' pamphlet, election requirements—1997 c 220: See RCW 36.102.800 through 36.102.803.

Part headings not law—Effective date—1995 3rd sp.s. c 1: See notes following RCW 82.14.0485.